Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.130

Property of deceased.

The coroner or medical examiner must, within thirty days after the investigation of the death, deliver to the county treasurer any money which may be found upon the body, unless claimed in the meantime by the legal representatives of the deceased. If there is personal property, other than money, found upon the body, unless claimed in the meantime by a legal representative of the deceased, the coroner or medical examiner shall, within one hundred eighty days of the investigation, be authorized to dispose of any property of no resale value and forward any other property to the applicable county agency to be sold at the next county surplus sale. Any proceeds from the sale shall be forwarded to the county treasurer. If the coroner or medical examiner fails to do so, the treasurer may proceed against the coroner or medical examiner to recover the same by a civil action in the name of the county.

[ 2004 c 79 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.130. Prior: Code 1881 s 2789; 1863 p 562 s 15; 1854 p 438 s 15; RRS s 4194.]